Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1661.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 806.5. Reporting costs associated with health care for illegal migrants.(a) Annual hospital report.- - Within 30 days after the end of each calendar year , a hospital licensed under this act shall submit a report to the department detailing the number of hospital admissions and emergency department visits made by 12345678910111213141516171819202122 illegal migrants within the previous calendar year . (b) Annual department report.--(1) By March 1 of each year, the department shall post a report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website with the total number of hospital admissions and emergency department visits made by illegal migrants within the previous calendar year. In the report, the department shall also include information relating to the costs of uncompensated care for illegal migrants, the impact of uncompensated care on the cost or ability of hospitals to provide services to the public, hospital funding needs and other related information.(2) The department shall submit the report under paragraph (1) to all of the following:(i) The Governor.(ii) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(iii) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(iv) The Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the Senate.(v) The Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(vi) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(vii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(c) Regulations.--The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this section.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20250HB1661PN2019 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Illegal migrant." An individual who is present in the United States in violation of 8 U.S.C. Ch. 12 (relating to immigration and nationality)."Uncompensated care." The cost of care provided to patients financially unable or unwilling to pay for services provided by a hospital.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1661PN2019 - 3 - 1234567